Wisconsin, session 2025, SB880.
do enact as follows:SB880,11Section 1. 16.705 (1s) of the statutes is amended to read:SB880,3,7216.705 (1s) If contractual services are purchased by the department or its 3agent that would require an individual performing the services to have access to 4federal tax information received directly from the federal Internal Revenue Service 5or from a source that is authorized by the federal Internal Revenue Service, a 6background check shall be performed on each individual performing the services. 7The background investigation may include requiring the individual to be 1fingerprinted on 2 fingerprint cards each bearing a complete set of the individual’s 2fingerprints, or by other technologies approved by law enforcement agencies. The 3department of justice shall submit any such fingerprint cards to the federal bureau 4of investigation for the purposes of verifying the identity of the individual 5fingerprinted and obtaining records of his or her criminal arrests and convictions. 6The department of revenue may be an agent of the department for the purchase of 7contractual services under this subsection.SB880,28Section 2. 41.152 (1) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 15, is 9amended to read:SB880,3,141041.152 (1) The state film office shall implement a program to accredit 11productions and certify expenses for purposes of ss. 71.07 (5f) and (5h), 71.28 (5f) 12and (5h), and 71.47 (5f) and (5h). Application for accreditation or certification shall 13be made to the office in for each taxable year for which accreditation or certification 14is desired.SB880,315Section 3. 71.05 (6) (b) 54. (intro.) of the statutes, as affected by 2025 16Wisconsin Act 15, is amended to read:SB880,3,231771.05 (6) (b) 54. (intro.) Except for a payment that is exempt under sub. (1) (a), 18(am), or (an), or that is exempt as a railroad retirement benefit, and except as 19provided under subds. subd. 54m. and 54mn., for taxable years beginning after 20December 31, 2020, up to $5,000 of payments or distributions received each year by 21an individual from a qualified retirement plan under the Internal Revenue Code or 22from an individual retirement account established under 26 USC 408 section 408 of 23the Internal Revenue Code, if all of the following conditions apply:SB880,41Section 4. 71.05 (6) (b) 54m. a. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 2Act 15, is amended to read:SB880,4,10371.05 (6) (b) 54m. a. Except for a payment that is exempt under sub. (1) (a), 4(am), or (an), or that is exempt as a railroad retirement benefit, and except as 5provided under subd. 54mn. subject to the limitations under subd. 54m. b., c., d., 6and e., for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, the amount, up to the 7limit specified in subd. 54m. b. or c., whichever is applicable, of the payments or 8distributions received by an individual each year from a qualified retirement plan 9under the Internal Revenue Code or from an individual retirement account 10established under 26 USC 408 section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code.SB880,511Section 5. 71.05 (6) (b) 54m. b. of the statutes is amended to read:SB880,4,151271.05 (6) (b) 54m. b. If the individual is at least 67 years of age before the close 13of the taxable year to which the subtraction relates, the amount claimed by the 14individual may claim the subtraction under this subdivision may not exceed 15$24,000 for that taxable year.SB880,616Section 6. 71.05 (6) (b) 54m. c. of the statutes is amended to read:SB880,4,231771.05 (6) (b) 54m. c. If An individual described under subd. 54m. b. may claim 18the subtraction under this subdivision in an amount not to exceed $24,000 for the 19taxable year, except that if the individual is married and is a joint filer, and both 20spouses are at least 67 years of age before the close of the taxable year to which the 21subtraction relates, the total amount claimed by the both spouses under this 22subdivision may not exceed $48,000 for that taxable year, regardless of the amount 23of the payment or distribution received by each spouse.SB880,71Section 7. 71.05 (6) (b) 54m. d. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 2Act 15, is amended to read:SB880,5,5371.05 (6) (b) 54m. d. An individual who claims the subtraction under this 4subdivision for a taxable year may not claim any credit, including any eligible 5carryover of such credit, listed under s. 71.10 (4) 71.07 for the same taxable year.SB880,86Section 8. 71.05 (6) (b) 54mn. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 7Act 15, is renumbered 71.05 (6) (b) 54m. e. and amended to read:SB880,5,18871.05 (6) (b) 54m. e. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024, for 9an individual who is a part-year resident of this state, the subtraction under this 10subdivision for the taxable year may not exceed the amount that is calculated by 11multiplying the applicable amount under subd. 54m. b. or c. $24,000 by a fraction 12the numerator of which is the individual’s wages, salary, tips, unearned income, 13and net earnings from a trade or business that are taxable by this state and the 14denominator of which is the individual’s total wages, salary, tips, unearned income, 15and net earnings from a trade or business. A nonresident of this state is not eligible 16to claim the subtraction under subd. 54m. An individual who claims the 17subtraction under this subdivision for a taxable year may not claim any credit listed 18under s. 71.10 (4) for the same taxable year this subdivision.SB880,919Section 9. 71.07 (5f) (a) 4. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2015, is amended to read:SB880,6,132171.07 (5f) (a) 4. “Production expenditures” means salaries, wages, or any 22other expenditures that are incurred in this state and directly used to produce an 23accredited production, including expenditures for writing, budgeting, casting, 24location scouts, set construction and operation, wardrobes, makeup, clothing 1accessories, photography, sound recording, sound synchronization, sound mixing, 2lighting, editing, film processing, film transferring, special effects, visual effects, 3renting or leasing facilities or equipment, renting or leasing motor vehicles, food, 4lodging, and any other similar pre-production, production, and post-production 5expenditure as determined by the state film office. “Production expenditures” 6includes expenditures for music that is performed, composed, or recorded by a 7musician who is a resident of this state or published or distributed by an entity that 8has its commercial domicile in this state; air travel that is purchased from a travel 9agency or company that has its commercial domicile in this state; and insurance 10that is purchased from an insurance agency or company that has its commercial 11domicile in this state. “Production expenditures” does not include salary or 12salaries, wages, or any other expenditures for the marketing and distribution of an 13accredited production.SB880,1014Section 10. 71.07 (5f) (c) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1515, is amended to read:SB880,6,241671.07 (5f) (c) 2. The total amount of the credits that may be claimed by a 17claimant under par. (b) 1. shall not exceed an amount equal to Only the first 18$250,000 of salary or wages paid to each of the claimant’s employees, as described in 19par. (b) 1., in the taxable year, not including the salary or wages paid to the 20claimant’s 2 highest-paid employees, as described in par. (b) 1., in the taxable year, 21if may be used to claim a credit under par. (b) 1. If the claimant’s budgeted 22production expenditures for the taxable year are $1,000,000 or more, the salaries or 23wages paid to the claimant’s 2 highest-paid employees in the taxable year may not 24be used to claim the credit.SB880,111Section 11. 71.07 (5f) (d) 3. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 215, is amended to read:SB880,7,12371.07 (5f) (d) 3. Any person, including a nonprofit entity described in section 4501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code, may sell or otherwise transfer a credit 5under par. (b) 1. or 3., in whole or in part, to another person who is subject to the 6taxes imposed under s. 71.02, 71.23, or 71.43, if the person notifies the department 7of the transfer, and submits with the notification a copy of the transfer documents, 8and the department certifies ownership of the credit. The transferee may first use 9the credit to offset tax of the transferor in the taxable year of the transferor in which 10the transfer occurs and may use the credit only to offset tax in taxable years in 11which the credit is otherwise allowed to be claimed and carried forward by the 12original claimant.SB880,1213Section 12. 71.07 (5h) (d) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 14Act 15, is amended to read:SB880,7,241571.07 (5h) (d) 2. Any person, including a nonprofit entity described in section 16501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code, may sell or otherwise transfer a credit 17under this subsection, in whole or in part, to another person who is subject to the 18taxes imposed under s. 71.02, 71.23, or 71.43, if the person notifies the department 19of the transfer, and submits with the notification a copy of the transfer documents, 20and the department certifies ownership of the credit. The transferee may first use 21the credit to offset tax of the transferor in the taxable year of the transferor in which 22the transfer occurs and may use the credit only to offset tax in taxable years in 23which the credit is otherwise allowed to be claimed and carried forward by the 24original claimant.SB880,131Section 13. 71.28 (5f) (a) 4. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 215, is amended to read:SB880,8,19371.28 (5f) (a) 4. “Production expenditures” means salaries, wages, or any 4other expenditures that are incurred in this state and directly used to produce an 5accredited production, including expenditures for writing, budgeting, casting, 6location scouts, set construction and operation, wardrobes, makeup, clothing 7accessories, photography, sound recording, sound synchronization, sound mixing, 8lighting, editing, film processing, film transferring, special effects, visual effects, 9renting or leasing facilities or equipment, renting or leasing motor vehicles, food, 10lodging, and any other similar pre-production, production, and post-production 11expenditure as determined by the state film office. “Production expenditures” 12includes expenditures for music that is performed, composed, or recorded by a 13musician who is a resident of this state or published or distributed by an entity that 14has its commercial domicile in this state; air travel that is purchased from a travel 15agency or company that has its commercial domicile in this state; and insurance 16that is purchased from an insurance agency or company that has its commercial 17domicile in this state. “Production expenditures” does not include salary or 18salaries, wages, or any other expenditures for the marketing and distribution of an 19accredited production.SB880,1420Section 14. 71.28 (5f) (c) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 2115, is amended to read:SB880,9,62271.28 (5f) (c) 2. The total amount of the credits that may be claimed by a 23claimant under par. (b) 1. shall not exceed an amount equal to Only the first 24$250,000 of salary or wages paid to each of the claimant’s employees, as described in 1par. (b) 1., in the taxable year, not including the salary or wages paid to the 2claimant’s 2 highest-paid employees, as described in par. (b) 1., in the taxable year, 3if may be used to claim a credit under par. (b) 1. If the claimant’s budgeted 4production expenditures for the taxable year are $1,000,000 or more, the salaries or 5wages paid to the claimant’s 2 highest-paid employees in the taxable year may not 6be used to claim the credit.SB880,157Section 15. 71.28 (5f) (d) 3. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 815, is amended to read:SB880,9,18971.28 (5f) (d) 3. Any person, including a nonprofit entity described in section 10501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code, may sell or otherwise transfer a credit 11under par. (b) 1. or 3., in whole or in part, to another person who is subject to the 12taxes imposed under s. 71.02, 71.23, or 71.43, if the person notifies the department 13of the transfer, and submits with the notification a copy of the transfer documents, 14and the department certifies ownership of the credit. The transferee may first use 15the credit to offset tax of the transferor in the taxable year of the transferor in which 16the transfer occurs and may use the credit only to offset tax in taxable years in 17which the credit is otherwise allowed to be claimed and carried forward by the 18original claimant.SB880,1619Section 16. 71.28 (5h) (d) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2015 Wisconsin 20Act 15, is amended to read:SB880,9,242171.28 (5h) (d) 2. Any person, including a nonprofit entity described in section 22501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code, may sell or otherwise transfer a credit 23under this subsection, in whole or in part, to another person who is subject to the 24taxes imposed under s. 71.02, 71.23, or 71.43, if the person notifies the department 1of the transfer, and submits with the notification a copy of the transfer documents, 2and the department certifies ownership of the credit. The transferee may first use 3the credit to offset tax of the transferor in the taxable year of the transferor in which 4the transfer occurs and may use the credit only to offset tax in taxable years in 5which the credit is otherwise allowed to be claimed and carried forward by the 6original claimant.SB880,177Section 17. 71.47 (5f) (a) 4. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 815, is amended to read:SB880,11,2971.47 (5f) (a) 4. “Production expenditures” means salaries, wages, or any 10other expenditures that are incurred in this state and directly used to produce an 11accredited production, including expenditures for writing, budgeting, casting, 12location scouts, set construction and operation, wardrobes, makeup, clothing 13accessories, photography, sound recording, sound synchronization, sound mixing, 14lighting, editing, film processing, film transferring, special effects, visual effects, 15renting or leasing facilities or equipment, renting or leasing motor vehicles, food, 16lodging, and any other similar pre-production, production, and post-production 17expenditure as determined by the state film office. “Production expenditures” 18includes expenditures for music that is performed, composed, or recorded by a 19musician who is a resident of this state or published or distributed by an entity that 20has its commercial domicile in this state; air travel that is purchased from a travel 21agency or company that has its commercial domicile in this state; and insurance 22that is purchased from an insurance agency or company that has its commercial 23domicile in this state. “Production expenditures” does not include salary or 1salaries, wages, or any other expenditures for the marketing and distribution of an 2accredited production.SB880,183Section 18. 71.47 (5f) (c) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 415, is amended to read:SB880,11,13571.47 (5f) (c) 2. The total amount of the credits that may be claimed by a 6claimant under par. (b) 1. shall not exceed an amount equal to Only the first 7$250,000 of salary or wages paid to each of the claimant’s employees, as described in 8par. (b) 1., in the taxable year, not including the salary or wages paid to the 9claimant’s 2 highest-paid employees, as described in par. (b) 1., in the taxable year, 10if may be used to claim a credit under par. (b) 1. If the claimant’s budgeted 11production expenditures are $1,000,000 or more, the salaries or wages paid to the 12claimant’s 2 highest-paid employees in the taxable year may not be used to claim 13the credit.SB880,1914Section 19. 71.47 (5f) (d) 3. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin Act 1515, is amended to read:SB880,12,21671.47 (5f) (d) 3. Any person, including a nonprofit entity described in section 17501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code, may sell or otherwise transfer a credit 18under par. (b) 1. or 3., in whole or in part, to another person who is subject to the 19taxes imposed under s. 71.02, 71.23, or 71.43, if the person notifies the department 20of the transfer, and submits with the notification a copy of the transfer documents, 21and the department certifies ownership of the credit. The transferee may first use 22the credit to offset tax of the transferor in the taxable year of the transferor in which 23the transfer occurs and may use the credit only to offset tax in taxable years in 1which the credit is otherwise allowed to be claimed and carried forward by the 2original claimant.SB880,203Section 20. 71.47 (5h) (d) 2. of the statutes, as affected by 2025 Wisconsin 4Act 15, is amended to read:SB880,12,14571.47 (5h) (d) 2. Any person, including a nonprofit entity described in section 6501 (c) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code, may sell or otherwise transfer a credit 7under this subsection, in whole or in part, to another person who is subject to the 8taxes imposed under s. 71.02, 71.23, or 71.43, if the person notifies the department 9of the transfer, and submits with the notification a copy of the transfer documents, 10and the department certifies ownership of the credit. The transferee may first use 11the credit to offset tax of the transferor in the taxable year of the transferor in which 12the transfer occurs and may use the credit only to offset tax in taxable years in 13which the credit is otherwise allowed to be claimed and carried forward by the 14original claimant. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb880 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb880 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB880 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB880 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB880: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting